District of Columbia statutes.
1-103

Officers of corporation.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia and the members of the Council of the District of Columbia shall be deemed and taken as officers of such corporation.

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 102, ch. 180, § 1
1967 Reorg. Plan No. 3, § 405, 81 Stat. 978
1981 Ed., § 1-103.
1973 Ed., § 1-103.
Organic Act of 1878: See Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 405 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.